Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 9 Missing Persons and Persons Believed to be Dead

Editor’s notes.

This chapter was effective January 1, 1998, to the extent that no vested rights of title, year’s support, succession, or inheritance are impaired, as provided by the version of Code Section 53-1-1 enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, effective January 1, 1998, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter, and enacted the current chapter.
The former chapter consisted of §§

53-9-1

through 53-9-47, and was based on Code 1933, §§ 113-2701a, 113-2702a, 113-2703a, 113-2704a, 113-2705a, 113-2706a, 113-2707a, 113-2708a, 113-2709a; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1131, §§ 1-7; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1134, §§ 1-7; Ga. L. 1972, p. 202, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1008, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 24.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 471 (1988).